Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Municipal Planning Commission

13-4-101. Creation of planning commission — Compensation — Appointment of members — Term of office — Vacancies — Training and continuing education.

The chief legislative body of any municipality, whether designated board of aldermen, board of commissioners or by other title, may create and establish a municipal planning commission. Such planning commission shall consist of not less than five (5) members and not more than ten (10) members, the number of members within the limits to be determined by the chief legislative body. One (1) of the members shall be the mayor of the municipality or a person designated by the mayor and one (1) of the members shall be a member of the chief legislative body of the municipality selected by that body. All other members shall be appointed by such mayor, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b). In making such appointments, the mayor shall strive to ensure that the racial composition of the planning commission is at least proportionately reflective of the municipality's racial minority population. The chief legislative body may determine whether, and in what amount, to compensate members of the planning commission. Any such compensation authorized is in addition to any other compensation received from the municipality. The compensation authorized by this section does not apply to members of a planning commission who also serve as members of a board of zoning appeals. The compensation authorized by this section may not be counted against a salary limitation established by charter or otherwise. The terms of appointive members shall be of such length as may be specified by the chief legislative body; provided, that they shall be so arranged that the term of one (1) member will expire each year. Any vacancy in an appointed membership shall be filled for the unexpired term by the mayor of the municipality, who shall also have authority to remove any appointed member at the mayor's pleasure.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), any member of a planning commission created by a municipality incorporated under a private act and having a population of not less than seven thousand four hundred (7,400) nor more than seven thousand five hundred (7,500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be appointed by a majority vote of the legislative body of the municipality.

All appointive members of the municipal planning commission created pursuant to subsection (a) in any municipality incorporated pursuant to title 6, chapter 18, having a population of not less than one thousand six hundred twenty-five (1,625) nor more than one thousand six hundred thirty-five (1,635) which lies within a county having a population of not less than thirty-four thousand four hundred (34,400) nor more than thirty-four thousand five hundred (34,500), both according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, or in any municipality having a population of not less than twenty-three thousand nine hundred (23,900) nor more than twenty-four thousand (24,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be appointed only by the chief legislative body of the municipality, and likewise any vacancy in an appointive membership shall be filled for the unexpired term only by the chief legislative body of the municipality, which shall also have the authority to remove any appointive member at its pleasure. In making such appointments, the chief legislative body shall strive to ensure that the racial composition of the planning commission is at least proportionately reflective of the municipality's racial minority population. Except as modified by this subsection (b), the provisions of subsection (a) shall remain in force.

Each planning commissioner shall, within one (1) year of initial appointment and each calendar year thereafter, attend a minimum of four (4) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (c)(5).

Each full-time or contract professional planner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the planning commission shall, each calendar year, attend a minimum of eight (8) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (c)(5). A professional planner who is a member of the American Institute of Certified Planners (AICP) shall be exempt from this requirement.

Each of the individuals listed in subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) shall certify by December 31 of each calendar year such individual's attendance by a written statement filed with the secretary of such individual's respective planning commission. Each statement shall identify the date of each program attended, its subject matter, location, sponsors, and the time spent in each program. A professional planner who is a member of the AICP shall be exempt from this requirement.

The legislative body of the municipality shall be responsible for paying the training and continuing education course registration and travel expenses for each planning commissioner and full-time professional planner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the planning commission.

The subjects for the training and continuing education required by subdivisions (c)(1) and (2) shall include, but not be limited to, the following: land use planning; zoning; flood plain management; transportation; community facilities; ethics; public utilities; wireless telecommunications facilities; parliamentary procedure; public hearing procedure; land use law; natural resources and agricultural land conservation; economic development; housing; public buildings; land subdivision; and powers and duties of the planning commission. Other topics reasonably related to the duties of planning commission members or professional planners or other administrative officials whose duties include advising the planning commission may be approved by majority vote of the planning commission prior to December 31 of the year for which credit is sought.

Each local planning commission shall keep in its official public record originals of all statements and the written documentation of attendance required to comply with these provisions for three (3) years after the calendar year in which each statement and appurtenant written documentation is filed.

Each planning commissioner and each professional planner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the planning commission shall be responsible for obtaining written documentation signed by a representative of the sponsor of any continuing education course for which credit is claimed, acknowledging the fact that the individual attended the program for which credit is claimed. A member of the AICP shall be exempt from this requirement.

If a planning commissioner fails to complete the requisite number of hours of training and continuing education within the time allotted by this subsection (c) or fails to file the statement required by this subsection (c), then this shall constitute a cause for the removal of the planning commission member from the planning commission.

The legislative body of the municipality may, at any time, opt out of this subsection (c) by passage of an ordinance. Further any such legislative body that has opted out may, at a later date, opt in by passage of an ordinance.

Acts 1935, ch. 34, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-501; Acts 1981, ch. 222, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 406, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 611, § 1; 1996, ch. 977, §§ 2, 3; 2002, ch. 862, § 4; 2008, ch. 734, § 1; 2008, ch. 1150, § 16; 2009, ch. 47, §§ 7-9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1986, ch. 820 contained the Municipal Development Authority Act of 1986 containing an alternative method of municipal planning; however, this act was amended to be eventually applicable only to Johnson City and is listed in the Uncodified Public Acts Index.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2002, ch. 862, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Planning Commission and Board of Zoning Appeals Training and Continuing Education Act of 2002.”

Cross-References. Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Open space, agricultural and forest land preservation, commission duties, §§ 11-15-107, 11-15-108, 67-5-1007.

Utility location, title 13, ch. 24, part 3.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Water Companies and Waterworks, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Regional planning commission's authority in urban growth areas. OAG 13-31, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (4/18/13).

13-4-102. Organization of commission — Rules — Staff — Finances.

Each municipal planning commission shall elect its chair from among its appointed members. The term of the chair shall be one (1) year with eligibility for reelection. Each municipal planning commission shall adopt rules for the transaction of business which shall include, but not be limited to, the selection of additional officers from among its members it deems appropriate to fulfill the organizational needs of the municipal planning commission, the requirements for the municipal planning commission to make findings of fact, statements of material evidence and reasons for its actions as part of each motion or action of the municipal planning commission and the keeping of a record of its resolutions, transactions, motions, actions, and determinations which shall be a public record. Any existing provision relating to the appointment of a planning director contained in any municipal, city or town charter or private act must be used in appointing a planning director. In the absence of such a provision, the chief executive officer of the municipality shall have the power to appoint and fix the compensation, within the funds appropriated by the legislative body for this purpose, of a planning director, who shall be qualified by membership in the American Institute of Certified Planners (AICP), experienced in city, regional or state planning or educated in a related academic field. Any person serving as a planning director on March 31, 2010, shall not be required to meet the aforementioned qualifications. For purposes of this section, “chief executive officer” shall mean city manager or administrator, where one exists. In the absence of a city manager or administrator, “chief executive officer” shall mean mayor. Where allowed under the prevailing local authority, the planning director shall have the power and authority to hire and fix the compensation, within the funds appropriated by the legislative body for this purpose, of such other employees and staff as the director may deem necessary for the work of the planning commission. Where allowed under the prevailing local authority, the municipal planning commission may also contract, within funds appropriated by the legislative body for this purpose, with planners or other experts for such services as it may require. In the absence of such authority, only the municipality may contract for such services. The appropriate financial official of the municipality, city or town, within the funds appropriated by the legislative body for this purpose, will disperse funds for the salary or salaries of the planning director and staff and the operational expenses of the planning office and the contracted services of planners or other experts retained to provide assistance to and studies, plans, reviews and reports for the municipal planning commission. The municipal planning commission may also, through the legislative body, receive and expend funds from grants, gifts, contracts, fees, and appropriations from federal, state, other local governments or private sources for the purpose of carrying on its planning functions.

Acts 1935, ch. 34, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-502; Acts 2010, ch. 701, § 1.

13-4-103. Powers of commission to promote municipal planning.

The commission may make reports and recommendations relating to the plan and development of the municipality to public officials and agencies, public utility companies, to civic, educational, professional and other organizations and to citizens. It may recommend to the executive or legislative officials of the municipality programs for public improvements and the financing for such programs. All public officials shall, upon request, furnish to the commission, within a reasonable time, such available information as it may require for its work. The commission, its members and employees, in the performance of its work, may enter upon any land and make examinations and surveys and place and maintain necessary monuments and marks on such land. In general, the commission shall have powers as may be necessary to enable it to perform its purposes and promote municipal planning.

Acts 1935, ch. 34, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-506.

Attorney General Opinions. Sale of land by a city to a private entity, OAG 07-030, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (3/15/07).

13-4-104. Submission of proposed construction to commission — Approval — Failure to approve — Overruling nonapproval.

Whenever the commission shall have adopted the plan of the municipality or any part thereof, then and thenceforth no street, park or other public way, ground, place or space, no public building or structure, or no public utility, whether publicly or privately owned, shall be constructed or authorized in the municipality until and unless the location and extent thereof shall have been submitted to and approved by the planning commission; provided, that in case of disapproval, the commission shall communicate its reasons to the chief legislative body of the municipality, and such legislative body, by a vote of a majority of its membership, shall have the power to overrule such disapproval and, upon such overruling, such legislative body shall have the power to proceed; provided, that if the public way, ground, place, space, building, structure or utility be one the authorization or financing of which does not, under the law governing the same, fall within the province of such legislative body, then the submission to the planning commission shall be by the state, county, district, municipal or other board or official having such jurisdiction, and the planning commission's disapproval may be overruled by such board by a majority vote of its membership, or by such official. The widening, narrowing, relocation, vacation, change in the use, acceptance, acquisition, sale or lease of any street or public way, ground, place, property or structure shall be subject to similar submission and approval, and the failure to approve may be similarly overruled. The failure of the commission to act within thirty (30) days from and after the date of official submission to it shall be deemed approval, unless a longer period be granted by such chief legislative body or other submitting board or official.

Acts 1935, ch. 34, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-507.

Cross-References. Submission of subdivision plats to commission, § 13-4-302.

13-4-105. Municipal planning commissions under special statutes — Force and effect.

Nothing contained in parts 1 and 2 of this chapter shall be deemed to modify or supplant any provision of any special or private statute providing for a municipal planning commission, and the provisions of any such statute relating to the organization and powers of such commission and all other provisions of any such special or private statutes shall remain in full force and effect, but, insofar as parts 1 and 2 of this chapter grant powers to municipal planning commissions not contained in such special statute, the planning commission created and acting under the special statute shall be deemed to have the additional powers granted in parts 1 and 2 of this chapter; provided, that § 13-4-104, regarding the legal status of the municipal plan, shall apply to every municipality with a planning commission, whether such commission shall have been established under a special or private act or under this chapter.

Acts 1935, ch. 34, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3493.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-508.